spanish.foma
define EtoIEReplacement e -> i e || _ [ n t | n d | n s | r d | r r ] ;

define EtoIEReplacementOther e -> i e || [ t | v ] _ [ n e ] ;

define EtoIEReplacementTripple e -> i e || p _ n ,, 
                               e -> i e || p _ r ,,
                               e -> i e || p _ z ,,
                               e -> i e || r _ t ,,
                               e -> i e || v _ s ,,
                               e -> i e || n _ g ;

define GInsertion [..] -> g || n "^" _ o ;

define OtoUEReplacement o -> u e || _ [ b | c | d | c h | f | g | h | j | k | l | l l | m | n | ñ | p | q | r | s | t | v | w | z ]+ "^" [ o | e | a ] ?* ;

define AntiOtoUEReplacementPlurals u e -> o || _ [ b | c | d | c h | f | g | h | j | k | l | l l | m | n | ñ | p | q | r | s | t | v | w | z ]+ "^" [ a m o s | á i s | e m o s | é i s ] ;

define AntiOtoUEReplacementInfinitive u e -> o || _ [ b | c | d | c h | f | g | h | j | k | l | l l | m | n | ñ | p | q | r | s | t | v | w | z ]+ "^" [ a r | e r | i r ] ;

define AntiOtoUEReplacementGerundPartic u e -> o || _ [ b | c | d | c h | f | g | h | j | k | l | l l | m | n | ñ | p | q | r | s | t | v | w | z ]+ "^" [ a d o | a d a | a d o s | a d a s | a n d o ] ;

define AntiOtoUEReplacementAfterP u e -> o || p _ n ?* ;

define AntiOtoUEReplacementForZC u e -> o || _ [ c | z c ] ;

define YInsertion [..] -> y || u _ "^" [ a | á | e | é | o | ó ] ?* ;

define ItoYReplacement i -> y || u "^" _ e ;

define CtoJReplacementForPreterito u c "^" i ó -> u j "^" ó ;

define CtoJReplacementForPreteritoOther u c "^" í -> u j "^" e ;

define CtoJReplacement c -> j || u _ "^" [ i | í ] ?+ ;

define CtoZCReplacement c -> z c || _ "^" [ a | á | o | ó ] ?* ;

define XZReplacement x -> c || _ e "^" s ,,
		     z -> c || _ e "^" s ;

define EInsertion [..] -> e || y | b | c | d | c h | f | g | h | j | k | l | l l | m | n | ñ | p | q | r | s | t | v | w | z | á | é | í | ó | ú _ "^" s ;

define Word [a|á|b|c|d|e|é|f|g|h|i|í|j|k|l|m|n|ñ|o|ó|p|q|r|s|t|u|ú|v|w|x|y|z]+;

define VSuffix [ a r | e r | i r ] -> 0 || _ "^";
define Cleanup "^" -> 0;

read lexc spanish.lexc
define Lexicon;

regex [ Word Lexicon ] .o. 
      ItoYReplacement .o.
      CtoZCReplacement .o.
      CtoJReplacementForPreterito .o.
      CtoJReplacementForPreteritoOther .o.
      CtoJReplacement .o.
      OtoUEReplacement .o.
      AntiOtoUEReplacementPlurals .o.
      AntiOtoUEReplacementInfinitive .o.
      AntiOtoUEReplacementGerundPartic .o.
      AntiOtoUEReplacementAfterP .o.
      AntiOtoUEReplacementForZC .o.
      EtoIEReplacement .o.
      EtoIEReplacementOther .o.
      EtoIEReplacementTripple .o.
      YInsertion .o.
      GInsertion .o.
      EInsertion .o.
      XZReplacement .o.
      Cleanup;
